Florida, session 2026, SB1360.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSection 267.23, Florida Statutes, is created to 17 read: 18 267.23âHistoric Cemeteries Trust Fund.â 19 (1)âThe Historic Cemeteries Trust Fund is created within 20 the division. The purpose of the trust fund is to act as a 21 depository for the long-term maintenance and upkeep of 22 cemeteries under the Historic Cemeteries Program. 23 (2)âMoneys must be deposited into the trust fund and 24 disbursed by the division as provided in s. 267.21. 25 (3)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351, 26 any balance in the trust fund at the end of any fiscal year must 27 remain in the trust fund at the end of the year and must be 28 available for carrying out the purposes of the trust fund. 29 (4)âIn accordance with s. 19(f), Art. III of the State 30 Constitution, the Historic Cemeteries Trust Fund, unless 31 terminated sooner, shall be terminated on July 1, 2030. Before 32 its scheduled termination, the trust fund must be reviewed as 33 provided in s. 215.3206(1) and (2). 34 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 35 SB 34 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 36 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 37 thereof and becomes a law.